District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Holding School Budgets Harmless During Modernizations Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 104(a)(6) of the Schools First in Budgeting Amendment Act of 2022,
effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-300; D.C. Official Code § 38-2851.03), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(b) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and”
in its place.
(c) A New subparagraph (D) is added to read as follows:
“(D) No decrease shall be made if the school is or will be utilizing a swing
space due to a modernization or other capital project conducted on site.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.